trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="v/eni__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eni</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>in</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ii</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ine</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>enim</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eniți</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>in</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>eneam</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eneai</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>enea</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>eneam</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eneați</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eneau</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>enisem</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eniseși</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>enise</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>enisem</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eniseți</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eniseră</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>in</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ii</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ină</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>enim</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eniți</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ină</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>enit</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>enită</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eniți</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>enite</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>enindu</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>enind</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>enind</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>ino</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ină</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>enim</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>eniți</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>eniți</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ină</l>
	  <r>eni<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    </pardef>

<e lm="veni">
        <i>v</i>
        <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="conveni">
        <i>conv</i>
        <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
      </e>
     <e lm="redeveni">
        <i>redev</i>
        <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="contraveni">
        <i>contrav</i>
        <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="deveni">
        <i>dev</i>
        <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="interveni">
        <i>interv</i>
        <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="preveni">
        <i>prev</i>
        <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="reveni">
        <i>rev</i>
        <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
      </e>
<e lm="veni pe lume" a="mioara">
        <i>v</i>
        <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>pe<b/>lume</l>
	  <r><g><b/>pe<b/>lume</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="proveni" a="delia">
  <i>prov</i>
  <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="surveni" a="delia">
  <i>surv</i>
  <par n="v/eni__vblex"/>
</e>
